Massachusetts, session 194th, H1132.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 24 of chapter 176O is hereby amended by adding the following paragraphs:
(f) Every external review must be conducted by a physician licensed to practice in the
Commonwealth of Massachusetts and certified in the medical specialty underlying the medical
claim at issue. Furthermore, such physician shall be identified to the patient, shall provide a
written report to the patient detailing any and all findings and opinions rendered along with
citations to any and all applicable peer reviewed materials which form the basis for such
opinions, shall, when circumstances warrant, conduct a physical examination of the patient, and
shall carry malpractice insurance for services rendered as part of the physician/patient
relationship established through the external review process.
(g) The patient may appeal any external review decision in the superior court department
of the trial court and, if successful, shall be entitled to recover any and all attorney's fees and
costs incurred from the risk-bearing provider organization.
of 1